New Jersey, session 222, S841.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the Ruth Gilbert Alzheimers Accessibility Act. 2.  Section 1 of P.L.1949, c.280 (C.39:4-204) is amended to read as follows: 1.   The phrase "person with a disability" means: a.   any person who has lost the use of one or more limbs as a consequence of paralysis, amputation, or other permanent disability or who has a permanent disability as to be unable to ambulate without the aid of an assisting device or whose mobility is otherwise limited as certified by a physician with a plenary license to practice medicine and surgery in this State or a bordering [State] state; a podiatrist licensed to practice in this State or a bordering state; a physician stationed at a military or naval installation located in this State who is licensed to practice in any state; a chiropractic physician licensed to practice in this State or a bordering state; a physician assistant licensed to practice in this State or a bordering state; or a nurse practitioner licensed to practice in this State or a bordering state; [or] b.   any citizen and resident of this State honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States who is adjudicated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or its successor, as being permanently 100 percent disabled; or c.   any person who has been diagnosed with Alzheimers disease or another form of dementia and whose ability to walk is limited, impaired, or creates a safety condition while walking as certified by a physician with a plenary license to practice medicine and surgery in this State or a bordering state; a physician stationed at a military or naval installation located in this State who is licensed to practice in any state; a physician assistant licensed to practice in this State or a bordering state; or a nurse practitioner licensed to practice in this State or a bordering state. (cf: P.L.2017, c.166, s.1) 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.